test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-laeteq11_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - läteq: # Noun (11) läteq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     läteq+N+Sg+Nom: läteq
     läteq+N+Sg+Gen: lätte
     läteq+N+Sg+Par: lätet
     läteq+N+Sg+Ill: [lättehe, lättede]
     läteq+N+Sg+Ine: [lätten, lätteh, lättehn]
     läteq+N+Sg+Ela: lättest
     läteq+N+Sg+All: lättele
     läteq+N+Sg+Ade: lättel
     läteq+N+Sg+Abl: lättelt
     läteq+N+Sg+Tra: lättes
     läteq+N+Sg+Ter: lätteniq
     läteq+N+Sg+Abe: lätteldäq
     läteq+N+Sg+Com: lättegaq
     läteq+N+Pl+Nom: lätteq
     läteq+N+Pl+Gen: [lättide, lättiide, lätete]
     läteq+N+Pl+Par: [lättit, lättiid]
     läteq+N+Pl+Ill: [lättihe, lättiihe, lättide, lättiide, lätetehe, lätetede]
     läteq+N+Pl+Ine: [lättin, lättiin, lättih, lättiih, lättihn, lättiihn, läteteh, lätetehn, läteten]
     läteq+N+Pl+Ela: [lättist, lättiist, lätetest]
     läteq+N+Pl+All: [lättile, lättiile, lätetele]
     läteq+N+Pl+Ade: [lättil, lättiil, lätetel]
     läteq+N+Pl+Abl: [lättilt, lättiilt, lätetelt]
     läteq+N+Pl+Tra: [lättis, lättiis, lätetes]
     läteq+N+Pl+Ter: [lättiniq, lättiiniq, läteteniq]
     läteq+N+Pl+Abe: [lättildäq, lättiildäq, läteteldäq]
     läteq+N+Pl+Com: [lättidegaq, lättiidegaq, lätetegaq]
